New York, session 2025-2026, A2275.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (v) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 3 of 2 section 3309 of the public health law, as added by chapter 148 of the 3 laws of 2020, is amended and a new subparagraph (vii) is added to read 4 as follows: 5 (v) As used in this section, "entity" includes, but is not limited to, 6 a school district, public library, board of cooperative educational 7 services, county vocational education and extension board, charter 8 school, non-public elementary or secondary school, restaurant, bar, 9 retail store, shopping mall, barber shop, beauty parlor, theater, sport- 10 ing or event center, public transit authority, inn, hotel or motel. 11 (vii) As used in this section, "public transit authority" means a 12 public authority established under the public authorities law which 13 provides public rail transportation services. 14 § 2. Section 3309 of the public health law is amended by adding a new 15 subdivision 10 to read as follows: 16 10. Every train and train station operated by a public transit author- 17 ity shall contain an opioid antagonist. Public transit authorities shall 18 provide training, approved by the commissioner, to employees on the 19 proper use of an opioid antagonist. 20 § 3. Section 77-a of the railroad law, as added by chapter 468 of the 21 laws of 1970, is amended to read as follows: 22 § 77-a. First-aid equipment on locomotives. It shall be unlawful to 23 operate a locomotive outside the designated yard limits of any railroad EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05752-01-5 A. 2275 2 1 in the state of New York unless said locomotive shall be equipped with a 2 first-aid kit containing necessary emergency medical equipment and 3 supplies. 4 Said kit shall include as minimum supplies: 5 1 roll of 1-inch wide gauze bandage -- minimum of 10 yards. 6 1 roll of 1-inch wide adhesive tape -- minimum of 5 yards. 7 1 package of absorbent gauze compresses, at least 3 inches by 3 inches 8 -- minimum of 6 in number. 9 At least 12 -- 1-inch individual sanitary band aids. 10 Bottle of iodine or mercurochrome or tincture of methyolate, or an 11 equivalent antiseptic, minimum of 1 ounce bottle. 12 Minimum of 2 ounce bottle of smelling salts or six ampoules of spirits 13 of ammonia. 14 Minimum of 3 ounce bottle of a standard eye wash preparation, with 15 necessary eye wash glass. 16 Jar or tube of white petroleum jelly or unguentine for burns. 17 An opioid antagonist. 18 All above material shall be packed in a suitable metal box or contain- 19 er and be sealed. 20 Items, as used, should be replaced within twenty-four hours by proper- 21 ly designated railroad personnel and such kit resealed for future use. 22 It shall be unlawful to remove or use any such first-aid kit, or any 23 supplies contained in any such kit, for other than first-aid purposes. 24 Violation of said provisions shall be punishable by a fine of not more 25 than twenty-five dollars. 26 § 4. Section 1266-a of the public authorities law, as added by chapter 27 928 of the laws of 1977, is amended to read as follows: 28 § 1266-a. Medical emergency services. The authority is hereby author- 29 ized and directed to prepare and develop a medical emergency services 30 program to be implemented at a time to be specified in such program for 31 the benefit of persons utilizing transportation and other related 32 services of the authority. Such program may include but not be limited 33 to provision for the following: The training of designated employees in 34 first aid, emergency techniques and procedures, handling and positioning 35 of stricken commuters, [and] knowledge of procedures and equipment used 36 for respiratory and cardiac emergencies, and knowledge and use of opioid 37 antagonists which shall be made available on all trains and in train 38 stations operated by the authority. Such program shall be submitted to 39 the legislature not later than one hundred eighty days next succeeding 40 the effective date of this section. 41 § 5. Paragraph a of subdivision 1 of section 1266-b of the public 42 authorities law, as amended by chapter 396 of the laws of 2005, is 43 amended to read as follows: 44 a. The authority in consultation with the Long Island Rail Road is 45 hereby authorized and directed to implement a comprehensive medical 46 emergency services program, including an emergency response protocol, 47 not later than September first, two thousand five, for the benefit of 48 persons utilizing transportation and other related services of the Long 49 Island Rail Road. Such program shall include but not be limited to 50 provision for the following: The training of designated employees in 51 first aid, emergency techniques and procedures, handling and positioning 52 of stricken commuters, knowledge of procedures and equipment used for 53 respiratory [and], cardiac emergencies and an emergency response proto- 54 col for all employees, and knowledge and use of opioid antagonists which 55 shall be made available on all trains and in all train stations operated 56 by the authority. A. 2275 3 1 § 6. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 2 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 3 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 4 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 5 on or before such effective date.